Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-509
Session laws and journals; sale; price; proceeds; disposal; section, termination.

Any remaining copies of the session laws and journals in the hands of the State Librarian shall be sold by the Supreme Court at a price of fifteen dollars for bound print copies of the session laws and forty dollars for bound print copies of the journal, except that after two years have elapsed from the date of publication, the court may sell any bound print copies of the session laws and journals at a price of twenty-five cents per volume. Any remaining copies of the session laws and journals in electronic format shall be sold by the Supreme Court at a price not to exceed the amount necessary to recover the cost of production, upon recommendation by the Clerk of the Legislature and approval of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.

The proceeds shall be remitted to the General Fund. When there is no longer a demand for session laws and journals over two years old, the Supreme Court may dispose of such session laws and journals in such manner as it deems proper.

This section terminates on January 1, 2027.

Laws 1907, c. 78, § 9, p. 291;

R.S.1913, § 3741;

Laws 1921, c. 213, § 5, p. 754;

C.S.1922, § 3134;

C.S.1929, § 49-509;

R.S.1943, § 49-509;

Laws 1945, c. 117, § 1, p. 390;

Laws 1965, c. 307, § 1, p. 864;

Laws 1971, LB 36, § 3;

Laws 1973, LB 83, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 572, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 534, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB1236, § 11.
July 18, 2026